Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 12 Polling Place Regulations Before Polls Open

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

26 Am. Jur. Elections §§ 301, 302.

29 C.J.S. Elections §§ 313 to 315.

§ 22-12-101.
Designation and notice of polling places; external location; change in location.

Polling places shall be designated by the county clerk, who shall publish their location at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county within two (2) weeks prior to a statewide election. Polling places may be located outside of the precinct if the board of county commissioners determines and records in its minutes the reasons that it is required by the public convenience.

A polling place designated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and used in the 2014 general election shall be not be changed unless a notice describing the proposed change is posted on the county’s official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and published once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks in the designated official newspaper of the county. The notice shall include the date and place of the county commissioners’ meeting where the proposed change will be discussed. The county clerk shall notify the county chairman of each political party in the county not later than fifteen (15) days before the meeting. A proposed change in the location of a polling place may be adopted by the county clerk at a meeting of the county commissioners during which the proposed change is discussed.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-170; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

added the (a) designation; and added (b).

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

§ 22-12-102.
Schools to be available for polling places.

School and community college districts shall make schools available for polling places if an authority conducting an election determines that use of schools is necessary.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-171.

§ 22-12-103.
Furnishing of booths.

The county clerk in all elections shall furnish each polling place with sufficient booths, paper ballots or voting machines and supplies to permit convenient and secret marking of ballots.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-172; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2.

§ 22-12-104.
Printed instruction cards.

The county clerk shall provide printed instruction cards to guide electors preparing ballots. These cards shall be printed in large clear type and indicate how to obtain a ballot, how to prepare the ballot for deposit in the ballot box, how to obtain a new ballot in place of one spoiled, and a statement of acts constituting a violation by voters of the Election Code.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-173.

§ 22-12-105.
Posting instruction card and sample ballot.

Before the polls are opened, the judges of election shall post in each booth one (1) instruction card. They shall post elsewhere in the polling place at least one (1) instruction card and one (1) sample ballot.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-174; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 2013 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “one (1)” for “three (3),” substituted “card” for “cards,” and substituted “ballot” for “ballots.”

§ 22-12-106.
Contents of voting booths.

Voting booths shall contain nothing except voting instructions and materials necessary for marking ballots.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-175; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2.

§ 22-12-107.
Materials for judges.

Before election day the county clerk shall cause to be delivered to one (1) of the judges of election in each polling place the following materials:

Pollbooks;

At any election specified in W.S. 22-2-101(a)(i) through (viii), registration applications;

A map of the precinct boundaries;

Ballot boxes in the number required by law with secure locks and keys and one (1) opening sufficient to admit a single ballot;

Voting machines, where required;

The number of ballots required by law;

and (viii) Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 38, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 86, § 2.

Other necessary supplies.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-176; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2005, ch. 110, § 1; 2008, ch. 115, § 1; 2011, ch. 38, § 2; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2017 ch. 86, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(i), deleted “and a list of registered electors residing in the precinct”; and in (a)(ii), substituted “any election specified in W.S. 22-2-101(a)(i) through (viii)” for “general and primary elections.”

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “single ballot” for “single folded ballot” in (a)(iv).

Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (a)(vii) and (viii) pertaining to ink pads and rubber stamp.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a), substituted “polling place” for “precinct.”

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, deleted former (a)(ix), which read: “Copies of the Election Code.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-12-108.
Delivery of ballots and stamps; breaking of seals.

Ballots shall be delivered under seal or otherwise properly secured and a receipt therefor signed by a judge of election shall be filed with the county clerk. Seals shall be broken on the morning of election day by the chief judge in the presence of the other judges before the polls are opened.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-177; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2011, ch. 38, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, deleted “and stamps” following “Ballots.”

§ 22-12-109.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, provided for distribution of copies of the Election Code.

§ 22-12-110.
Supplies for voting machines.

When voting machines are used the county clerk shall have an appropriate official deliver to a judge of election in each polling place, before the day of election, the following supplies:

The key to each machine sealed in an envelope;

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 31 § 2.

Other appropriate instructional devices.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-179; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2013 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to voting machines generally, see §§

22-10-101

to

22-10-111

.

As to electronic voting systems, see §§

22-11-102

to

22-11-108

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, repealed former (a)(ii), which read: “At least four (4) facsimile diagrams of the entire face of the voting machine as it will appear on election day.”

The 2015 amendment,

in (a), substituted “polling place” for “precinct.”

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-12-111.
[Repealed.]

History.

2013 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 22-12-112.
Procedure for preparing voting machines for use.

Before the polls open the judges shall compare ballots on the voting machines with the sample ballots and return sheets to see that they are correct, place the voting machine in a proper position free from obstruction and assure that the face of the machine may be viewed clearly by the voter casting the ballot but not by others. Envelopes containing keys shall not be opened if the numbers and records on them do not correspond to the numbers and records on the machine. If the numbers do not agree, the machine shall be reexamined and certified by the county clerk before it may be used.

History:

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-181; 2008, ch. 115, § 1; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “by the voter casting the ballot but not by others” for “except when the curtain on the machine is closed for casting ballots” at the end of the first sentence.

Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2014 amendment,

in the first sentence, substituted “ballots” for “ballot labels.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

§ 22-12-113.
Setting of registering counters.

The judges shall see that all registering counters are set at zero (00000) and that the voting machines are in proper condition. If the machine is equipped with a mechanical or photographic printout device, the election board shall determine that counters are set at zero (00000) by using the printout device. Any count on a machine shall be noted and certified by the judges to permit subtraction of this count when votes are canvassed.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-182.

§ 22-12-114.
Certification of voting machines.

The judges shall certify that keys are delivered, that numbers on registering counters and seals correspond with those on key envelopes, that counters are set at zero (00000) or counts certified, that ballots are proper and that the machines are ready for voting.

History:

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-183; 2014 ch. 108, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

substituted “ballots” for “ballot labels.”

Laws 2014, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

§ 22-12-115.
Examination of ballot box.

Before the polls are open, the judges of election shall open and examine the ballot box to determine that it is empty and relock it. The ballot box shall not again be opened until the polls are closed, except when necessitated by operation of the voting equipment at the direction of the county clerk and only in the presence of two (2) or more election judges with different political party affiliations. It shall not be removed from the presence of the judges of election or counting board until all ballots are counted and recorded.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-184; 2008, ch. 115, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

added “except when necessitated by operation of the voting equipment at the direction of the county clerk and only in the presence of two (2) or more election judges with different political party affiliations” in the second sentence.

Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.